Arkansas, session 2025, HB1924.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-10-117(d), concerning the requirement
that the State Board of Education establish rules regarding the
implementation of four-day school weeks, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) The State Board of Education shall establish appropriate
standards, guidelines, and rules for the determination of average daily
membership of school districts and for the distribution of state aid to each
local school district that elects to operate any or all of the public schools
of its school district on a four-day school-week basis, to provide the school
district with an equitable share of aid funds designated to equate a four-day
school-week operation by the school district to the educational opportunities
provided by a school district offering a five-day school week.
(2) Provided, however, that a A school district shall not
receive any more state financial aid for offering a four-day school week of
*TNL370*
03/31/2025 1:35:50 PM TNL370

HB1924
instruction than it would have received for offering a five-day school week
of instruction.


































03/31/2025 1:35:50 PM TNL370